cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Bezpečnost a zabezpečení vozidel > Autoalarmy a zámky pro automobily > Autozámky a jejich součásti: Motory zámků dveří vozidel; Odemykací páčky dveří vozidel; Zámky dveří a uzamykací systémy vozidel
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Безопасност и сигурност на превозни средства > Аларми и ключалки за превозни средства > Ключалки и части за врати на превозни средства: Машинки за централно заключване на превозни средства; Копчета за заключване на врати на превозни средства; Ключалки и заключващи системи за врати на превозни средства
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøysikkerhet > Kjøretøyalarmer og -låser > Bildørlåser og -deler: Aktuatorer til bildørlåser; Knotter til bildørlåser; Bildørlåser og -låsesystemer
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Segurança e proteção para veículos > Fechos e alarmes para veículos > Peças e fechos de portas para veículos: Atuadores de fechos de portas para veículos; Manípulos de fechos de portas para veículos; Fechos e sistemas de fecho de portas para veículos
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Fahrzeugsicherheit > Auto-Alarmanlagen & Schließsysteme > Kfz-Türschlösser: Kfz-Türschlosssicherungen; Türknöpfe; Türschlösser & Schließsysteme
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ความปลอดภัยและการรักษาความปลอดภัยรถยนต์ > สัญญาณกันขโมยและล็อกสำหรับรถยนต์ > อะไหล่และกลอนประตูรถยนต์: มอเตอร์ล็อกประตูรถยนต์; ที่จับล็อกประตูรถยนต์; กลอนและระบบล็อกประตูรถยนต์
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Taşıt Güvenliği ve Emniyeti > Araç Alarmları ve Kilitleri > Motorlu Taşıt Kapı Kilitleri: Motorlu Taşıt Kapı Kilit Kumandaları; Motorlu Taşıt Kapı Kilit Mandalları; Motorlu Taşıt Kapı Kilitleri ve Kilitleme Sistemleri
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 车辆安全防盗用品 > 交通工具警报器与锁 > 车辆门锁和零部件: 车辆闭锁器; 车门锁扭; 车辆门锁和闭锁系统
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Sicurezza e protezioni per veicoli > Sistemi di blocco per veicoli > Serrature e parti per portiere di veicoli: Attuatori per serrature di veicoli; Levette bloccaportiere per veicoli; Serrature e sistemi di chiusura delle portiere di veicoli
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Segurança de veículos > Alarmes e travas para veículos > Travas e peças de travas para portas de veículos: Atuadores de travas para portas de veículos; Pinos de travas para portas de veículos; Sistemas de travas e bloqueio para portas de veículos
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Safety & Security > Vehicle Alarms & Locks > Vehicle Door Locks & Parts: Vehicle Door Lock Actuators; Vehicle Door Lock Knobs; Vehicle Door Locks & Locking Systems
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Siguranța și securitatea vehiculelor > Alarme și antifurturi pentru vehicule > Încuietori și piese pentru uși auto: Dispozitive de acționare pentru blocarea ușii vehiculului; Butoane de blocare a ușii vehiculului; Încuietori pentru uși și sisteme de închidere auto
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Sigurnost i zaštita vozila > Alarmi i brave za vozila > Brave i dijelovi za vrata vozila: Pokretači za zaključavanje vrata vozila; Kvake za zaključavanje vrata vozila; Brave i sustavi za zaključavanje vrata vozila
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Bezpečnosť a zabezpečenie vozidla > Autoalarmy a zámky > Zámky a diely dverí vozidiel: Servomotorčeky zámku dverí vozidla; Gombíky zámku dverí vozidla; Zámky a uzamykacie systémy dverí vozidiel
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Veiligheid en bescherming voor voertuigen > Alarmen en vergrendelingen voor voertuigen > Deurvergrendelingen voor motorvoertuigen: Deurvergrendelingsmechanismen voor motorvoertuigen; Deurvergrendelingsknoppen voor motorvoertuigen; Deurvergrendelingen en -vergendelingssystemen voor motorvoertuigen
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Varnost in zaščita vozil > Alarmi in ključavnice za vozila > Ključavnice in deli za zaklepanje vrat vozila: Aktuatorji za zaklepanje vrat vozil; Ročice za zaklepanje vrat vozil; Ključavnice in sistemi za zaklepanje vrat vozil
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonssäkerhet > Säkerhets- och låssystem för fordon > Dörrlås och dörrlåstillbehör för fordon: Antennmotorer för fordonslås; Låsknoppar till fordonsdörrar; Lås- och låssystem till fordonsdörrar
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 안전/보안 > 자동차 경보/잠금 장치 > 차량 도어 로크/부품: 차량 도어 로크 액추에이터; 차량 도어 로크 노브; 차량 도어 로크/잠금 장치
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物の安全・防犯関連用品 > 乗り物用アラーム・ロックシステム > 乗り物用ドアロック・関連パーツ: 乗り物用ドアロックアクチュエーター; 乗り物用ドアロックノブ; 乗り物用ドアロック・ロックシステム
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Seguridad y protección para vehículos > Sistemas de alarmas y bloqueo > Cierres y piezas para puertas de vehículos: Accionadores de cierres para puertas de vehículos; Seguros para puertas de vehículos; Cierres y sistemas de bloqueo para puertas de vehículos
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműbiztonság és -védelem > Járműriasztók és -zárak > Járműajtózárak és -alkatrészek: Járműajtózár-működtetők; Járműajtózár-gombok; Járműajtózárak és zárrendszerek
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Køretøjssikkerhed > Sikkerheds- og låsesystemer til motorkøretøjer > Dørlåse til køretøjer: Dørlåscylinder til køretøjer; Knopper til dørlåse til køretøjer; Dørlåse og låsesystemer til køretøjer
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Ajoneuvon turvallisuus > Auton hälyttimet ja lukot > Ajoneuvon oven lukot ja osat: Auton ovien lukitus; Auton oven lukitusnupit; Ajoneuvon oven lukot ja lukitusjärjestelmät
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Sécurité des véhicules > Systèmes d'alarme et de verrouillage de véhicule > Serrures pour véhicules motorisés: Commandes de verrouillage de portes; Boutons de verrouillage de portes; Serrures et systèmes de verrouillage de portes
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > An toàn và an ninh xe cộ > Chuông báo trộm & khóa xe > Khóa cửa và phụ tùng xe: Bộ dẫn động khóa cửa xe; Núm khóa cửa xe; Khóa cửa và hệ thống khóa xe
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ασφάλεια & προστασία οχημάτων > Συναγερμοί & κλειδαριές οχημάτων > Κλειδαριές θυρών & εξαρτήματα οχημάτων: Μηχανισμοί κλειδώματος θυρών οχημάτων; Κουμπιά κλειδώματος θυρών οχημάτων; Κλειδαριές θυρών και συστήματα κλειδώματος οχημάτων
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Защитная экипировка и товары для обеспечения безопасности транспортных средств > Сигнализации и замки для транспортных средств > Дверные замки для транспортных средств и их детали: Приводы дверных замков для транспортных средств; Кнопки дверных замков для транспортных средств; Дверные замки и системы блокировки для транспортных средств
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛安全 > 汽車警報器/防盜鎖 > 車門鎖與零件: 車門鎖致動器; 車門栓; 車門鎖/門鎖系統
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių sauga ir apsauga > Transporto priemonių signalizacijos ir užraktai > Transporto priemonių durelių spynelės ir dalys: Transporto priemonių durelių užraktų aktuatoriai; Transporto priemonių durelių užraktų rankenėlės; Transporto priemonių durelių užraktai ir užrakinimo sistemos
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Zabezpieczenia pojazdów > Alarmy i zamki samochodowe > Zamki do drzwi samochodowych i ich elementy: Blokady drzwi do pojazdów; Rygle do drzwi samochodowych; Zamki i systemy ryglowania drzwi samochodowych